Hawaii, session 2026, GM1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Public Law 103-150,
states, inter alia, that the Republic of Hawaii ceded 1,800,000
acres of crown, government, and public lands of the Kingdom of
Hawaii, without the consent of or compensation to the Native
Hawaiian people of Hawaii or their sovereign government, and
that the indigenous Hawaiian people never directly relinquished
their claims to their inherent sovereignty as a people or over
their national lands to the United States.
In Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022 (Act 226), which in
part established the public land trust working group, the
legislature stated in relevant part:
"It is incumbent upon the legislature to enact
legislation that upholds its trust responsibilities
and duty of care to native Hawaiians to:
(1) Account for all ceded lands in the public
lands trust inventory;
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx
Hllllilllllilllllllillll

Page 2
S.B. NO. “a
C.D. 1
(2) Account for all income and proceeds derived
from the public land trust; and
(3) Transfer the full twenty per cent pro rata
share of income and proceeds from the public
land trust annually to the office of
Hawaiian affairs (OHA) for the betterment
of the conditions of native Hawaiians.
The genesis and source of the State's public land
trust responsibility to native Hawaiians are the
historical events that led to the illegal overthrow
of the Kingdom of Hawaii; the transfer of
approximately 1,800,000 acres of crown, government,
and public lands to the United States under the 1898
Joint Resolution of Annexation without the consent of
and without compensation to the native Hawaiian people
or their sovereign government; the admission of Hawaii
as a state of the Union in 1959, with the explicit
trust responsibility and requirement in section 5(f)
of the 1959 Admission Act that one of the five
purposes of the public land trust is that the income
and proceeds from the public land trust are to be used
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 2
iiiHiniiiiiiiciiiiiniiiiiiii

Page 3 903
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
"for the betterment of the conditions of native
Hawaiians"; and the 1978 Constitutional Convention's
recognition that native Hawaiians are one of the
beneficiaries of the public land trust and the
creation of OHA to manage and administer the specific
allocation of "all income and proceeds from that pro
rata portion of the [public land] trust . . . for
native Hawaiians" (Article XII, section 6, of the
Hawaii State Constitution). The United States and
the courts have consistently affirmed the trust nature
of the government and crown lands, including large
tracts of ceded lands used for military or other
purposes under federal control.
In 1959, as a condition of its admission into
the Union, the State of Hawaii agreed to hold certain
lands granted to the State by the United States in a
public trust for five purposes delineated in
section 5(f) of the Admission Act, which provides in
relevant part:
The lands -granted to the State of Hawaii by
subsection (b) of this section and public lands
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx
iniiiniiliiiiiiiiiiinBn

Page 4 903
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
retained by the United States under subsections (c)
and (d) and later conveyed to the State under
subsection (e), together with the proceeds from the
sale or other disposition of any such lands and the
income therefrom, shall be held by said State as a
public trust [(1)] for the support of the public
schools and other public educational institutions,
[(2)] for the betterment of the conditions of native
Hawaiians, as defined in the Hawaiian Homes Commission
Act, 1920, as amended, [(3)] for the development of
farm and home ownership on as widespread a basis as
possible [(4)] for the making of public improvements,
and [(5)] for the provision of lands for public use.
Such lands, proceeds, and income shall be managed and
disposed of for one or more of the foregoing purposes
in such manner as the constitution and laws of said
State may provide, and their use for any other object
shall constitute a breach of trust for which suit may
be brought by the United States.
{Emphasis added.)
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx
iiimiiniinHffiiMiiH

Page 5 S.B. NO. SSa
C.D. 1
In 1978, the people of Hawaii affirmed the
State's trust obligation to native Hawaiians by
ratifying constitutional amendments from the
Constitutional Convention, including article XII,
sections 4, 5, and 6, of the Hawaii State
Constitution, which established OHA and charged it
with managing income and proceeds from the public land
trust for the benefit of native Hawaiians. Article
XVI, section 7, of the Hawaii State Constitution
required the State to enact legislation to comply with
its trust obligations. Thus, in 1979, legislation,
codified as chapter 10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, set
forth the purposes of OHA and described the duties of
its trustees.
In September 1981, an initial land inventory by
the department of land and natural resources listed
approximately 1,271,652 acres, falling woefully short
of its duty to provide a complete inventory of the
public land trust lands. Additionally, the state land
information management system does not include all
lands held by all state entities.
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 5
iHiummHiiiiiiiiiiiM

Page 6
S.B. NO.
• H.D. 2
C.D. 1
Act 273, Session Laws of Hawaii 1980, enacted
section 10-13.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to
implement OHA's pro rata share and required that OHA
receive "[t]wenty per cent of all funds derived from
the public land trust[.]" This legislative directive
addressing the constitutional mandate has led to a
series of lawsuits and legislative enactments
concerning OHA's constitutional pro rata share of the
public land trust. The State and OHA have labored to
resolve the political question of the statutory pro
rata share of income and proceeds derived from the
public land trust, and payment to OHA.
Act 178, Session Laws of Hawaii 2006, affirmed
the State's trust obligation to native Hawaiians by
IS requiring that the department of land and natural
resources provide an annual accounting of
revenue-generating public trust lands and the amounts
derived from those lands to the legislature. The
measure also set a fixed amount of $15,100,000 from
the pro rata share of the public land trust income
and proceeds due to OHA for the betterment of the
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 6
IIMIMIIIiMIMIIIIIillll

Page 7
S.B. NO.
h.D.2
C.D. 1
conditions of native Hawaiians until further action
is taken by the legislature for this purpose.
Act 15, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, (Act 15)
was enacted to address past-due amounts, which
accumulated during the period between November 7,
1978, up to and including June 30, 2012, of income
and proceeds from the public land trust owed to OHA
by implementing an agreement between the State and
OHA for the State to convey certain lands in Kakaako,
Oahu, to OHA valued at approximately $200,000,000.
Act 15 did not, however, address the State's
constitutional obligations relating to OHA's twenty
per cent pro rata share of the income and proceeds
from the public land trust generated after June 30,
2012. Notably, a 2015-2016 financial review initiated
by OHA found that the minimum amount of total gross
receipts from sources that OHA has historically
claimed was approximately $394,322,163 in the fiscal
year 2015-2016. Twenty per cent of this gross amount
is approximately $78,900,000."
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 7
IlilllinmiliHIHHINIIHII

Page 8
S.B. NO. =
C.D. 1
In 2022, the legislature found that to uphold its
constitutional trust obligation and duty to native Hawaiians, it
needed to enact another legislative measure in light of the
information, data, and facts provided to the legislature by
state agencies since the enactment of Act 178, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2006, more than a decade earlier.
Act 226 was enacted to:
(1) Increase the office of Hawaiian affairs' interim
annual share of the income and proceeds of the public
land trust beginning in fiscal year 2022-2023 from
$15,100,000 to $21,500,000;
(2) Appropriate $64,000,000 to the office of Hawaiian
affairs; and
(3) Establish a public land trust working group (working
group) to determine the pro rata share of income and
proceeds from the public land trust-due annually to
the office of Hawaiian affairs after June 30, 2022.
The legislature finds that Act 54, Session Laws of Hawaii
2011 (Act 54), mandates the establishment of a comprehensive
information system to inventory and maintain information about
the lands of the public land trust as described in section 5(f)
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of the Admission Act and article XII, section 4, of the Hawaii
State Constitution. The department of land and natural
resources worked with a consultant to develop a public land
trust information system (information system) to satisfy the
requirements of Act 54. The information system will be a
geographic information system that is intended for a complete
inventory of all state-owned and county-owned lands, as well as
a complete inventory of encumbrances issued by state and county
agencies over these lands. To meet these goals, each state or
county agency must submit comprehensive lists of its land and
encumbrance inventories.
The legislature further finds that the working group
established under Act 226 was assigned to:
(1) Account for all ceded lands in the public land trust
inventory;
(2) Account for all income and proceeds from the public
land trust; and
(3) Subsequently determine the twenty per cent pro rata
share of income and proceeds from the public land
trust due annually to the office of Hawaiian affairs
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 9
IIIMHillllllllillinUllil

Page 10
S.B. NO.
^2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
for the betterment of the conditions of Native
Hawaiians.
In December 2023, the working group submitted to all state
agencies that hold title to, maintain management control over,
or otherwise use ceded lands, a written request to provide
information, data, documents, and maps to ensure that those
agencies have completely and accurately identified and reported
to the department of land and natural resources: (1) all ceded
land parcels for the purpose of an inventory; and (2) all income
and proceeds collected or received from the public land trust.
The working group has been informed that the last financial
review by an outside independent accounting firm of the pro rata
share was the fiscal year 2015-2016 financial review initiated
by the office of Hawaiian affairs. At the time, the financial
review identified total gross receipts from historically claimed
public land trust revenue sources in the minimum amount of
approximately $394,322,163 in fiscal year 2015-2016. Twenty per
cent of this gross amount is approximately $78,900,000. The
working group found that there has been no new financial review
since the 2015-2016 financial review. The 2016 financial review
cost $145,404.
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 10
IIIHilllllllliMllllliHI

Page 11
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
The legislature notes that Act 178, Session Laws of Hawaii
2006 (Act 178) , requires the department of land and natural
resources, with the cooperation of the department of budget and
finance and any other state department or agency that uses or
manages public lands, to provide an accounting of all receipts
from lands described in section 5(f) of the Admission Act for
the prior fiscal year. The worlcing group has been informed that
state agencies' self-reported information for the purposes of
these reports is not audited or reviewed for accuracy by the
department of land and natural resources.
The working group has been informed that work began on the
process to procure a consultant for the information system after
the enactment of Act 54 and that the development of the
information system began in 2012 and the information system was
launched in October 2018. Act 54 appropriated up to $360,000
from a land conservation fund for the work by an outside
independent consultant. The final amount for the creation of
the information system and training was $340,382.
As part of the implementation of the information system,
all state and county agencies that hold title to land are
required to submit their entire land inventory, regardless of
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx ]
iiiiiiiiiHiHnniiiiHiii

Page 12 903
S.B. NO
S.D.2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
the public land trust status, regardless of whether there are
any encumbrances on the land, and regardless of whether revenue
is being generated on the land. All state and county agencies
are additionally required to submit encumbrances that they have
issued over state-owned and county-owned land, regardless of
whether they hold title to that land and regardless of whether
they were revenue generating. This information includes all
encumbrances, including leases, permits, right-of-entries, and
easements. The goal was to have ail encumbrances issued over
state-owned and county-owned land represented in the information
system.
As with the reporting to the department of land and natural
resources on public land trust revenues, the information system
is also based on self-reporting by state agencies and the
counties. There are some disclaimers about the information.
The department of land and natural resources has encouraged all
state and county departments to regularly update data in the
system. Updates, however, are also based on self-reported
information. The legislature believes that independent
third-party professionals need to evaluate this practice.
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 12
iniiiiHiiiiiiiiiHiiiiii

Page 13
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
The working group has been informed that when a parcel
consists of both ceded and nonceded lands, the state agencies
use a "rule of thumb" to determine whether a parcel is ceded or
not. When more than fifty per cent of a parcel is ceded land,
it is categorized as ceded. The working group has been unable
to determine whether this method is detrimental to the
calculation of the office of Hawaiian affairs' pro rata share.
The legislature believes that independent third-party
professionals need to evaluate this practice.
The working group has also been informed that there are
many parcels without tax map key numbers in the information
system and therefore may not be included in the system. This
situation is particularly so for submerged lands, which are
generally considered public land trust lands. The legislature
believes that independent third-party professionals need to
evaluate how to include these parcels so that the information
system contains the complete and accurate inventory.
The working group has been informed that lands under
federal jurisdiction are not included in the information system
ZO and that the counties do not report any of the revenue from the
public land trust to the department of land and natural
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 13
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiia

Page 14
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
resources for the purposes of the annual accounting required
pursuant to Act 178 (Act 178 report).
To the Icnowledge of the working group, there has been no
third-party independent audit, review, or evaluation of the
thoroughness and accuracy of the information system or the
current reporting by agencies for the purpose of preparing the
annual Act 178 report, nor has there been any analysis or
comparison of the data in the information system with the data
in the Act 178 report.
The working group has conducted research and has determined
that the services of one or more third-party independent
consultants with the necessary financial, accounting, and land
inventory expertise will be appropriate to address the concerns
that have been raised regarding the thoroughness and accuracy of
the information system, to ensure that the working group
completes its objectives under Act 226.
The legislature further finds that Act 304, Session Laws of
Hawaii 1990, defined "revenue" for purposes of calculating the
office of Hawaiian affairs' pro rata share of public land trust
revenues. However, there continue to be longstanding disputes
regarding the proper calculation of income and proceeds derived
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 1
IliBINIIHIMUillllilN

Page 15
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
from the public land trust. The legislature also finds that
chapter lOH, Hawaii Revised Statutes, recognizes the role of the
office of Hawaiian affairs in facilitating conditions that
support self-determination and nation-building for the Native
Hawaiian people, as determined by Native Hawaiians themselves,
without prescribing a particular form, structure, or pathway of
governance. The legislature additionally finds that recent
reductions in federal funding for programs that serve Native
Hawaiians have increased the need for funds from the office of
Hawaiian affairs' pro rata share of income and proceeds from the
public land trust to ensure continuity of essential services.
Therefore, the legislature determines that it is necessary to
clarify revenue methodologies, support reconciliation efforts,
and provide interim financial support while a comprehensive
framework is developed.
The legislature further finds that chapter 6K, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, which established the Kaho'olawe island reserve
commission, provides a framework for the restoration,
management, and eventual transfer of lands to a sovereign Native
Hawaiian entity and reflects the State's recognition of Native
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 15
iiimiiiiiMiiiinHiiiii

Page 16 M KIO
O.D. NO.
SD2
C.D. 1
Hawaiian self-determination and the return of land stewardship
to Native Hawaiian people.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Amend the membership and responsibilities of the
public land trust working group established pursuant
to Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022;
(2) Require the public land trust working group to submit
reports to the legislature, as follows:
(A) By August 1, 2027, a first interim report
regarding the Act 178 financial reporting and
accounting;
(B) By December 1, 2027, a second interim report
regarding the public land trust inventory;
(C) By June 1, 2028, a third interim report that
includes a preliminary draft of findings and
recommendations regarding Act 178 financial
reporting and accounting and the public land
trust inventory; and
(D) By October 1, 2028, a final report that includes
proposed legislation;
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx 16
lillilliilllinillUHilH

Page 17
S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
(3) Require the office of Hawaiian affairs to submit
certain findings and considerations to the legislature
and provide administrative support to the working
group in coordination with a third-party consultant;
(4) Require the public land trust working group to
evaluate and recommend a process by which the State
may initiate and conduct negotiations with the office
of Hawaiian affairs regarding a comprehensive public
land trust reconciliation framework, to include:
(A) Determining the nature of the revenues from the
public land trust that constitute the pro rata
share of the office of Hawaiian affairs,
considering the definition of "revenue"
previously enacted by section 3 of Act 304,
Session Laws of Hawaii 1990;
(B) Determining a methodology and formula for
calculating the amounts necessary to fulfill the
State's obligations relating to public land trust
revenue claims from July 1, 2012; and
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 17
IWIlilHHWill

Page 18
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(C) Determining the conditions under which the office
of Hawaiian affairs may negotiate a master
settlement with the State; and
(5) Transfer, on a one-time basis, a portion of income and
proceeds from the public land trust to the office of
Hawaiian affairs.
SECTION 2. Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, is
amended by amending section 3 to read as follows:
"SECTION 3. (a) There is established a working group to:
(1) Account for all ceded lands in the public land trust
inventory;
(2) Account for all income and proceeds from the public
land trust; and
(3) Subsequently determine the twenty per cent pro rata
share of income and proceeds from the public land
trust due annually to the office of Hawaiian affairs
for the betterment of the conditions of Native
Hawaiians.
(b) The working group shall be [comprised] composed of
[six momboro/—throe of whom throe -sha-11 be] the following;
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 18
HIHIHIIIHiHIHDIil

Page 19
S.B. NO. s“2
C.D. 1
(1) Three roembers appointed by the governor [and throe of
whom shall tec]2.
(2) Three members appointed by the office of Hawaiian
affairs [board of trustees.]£
(3) One member appointed by the president of the senate,
who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member;
(4) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, who shall serve as an ex officio,
nonvoting member;
(5) One member of the senate appointed by the president of
the senate, who shall serve as an ex officio,
nonvoting member;
(6) One member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives, who
shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member; and
(7) One non-governmental community member selected by the
members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1) through
(6) .
All members shall meet some of the following
qualifications; experience in financial accounting or auditing;
experience in complex negotiations; expertise in Native Hawaiian
2026-2571 SB903 GDI SMA.docx
iiiinniiMmiiiiiiinii

Page 20
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
history, governance, and legal entitlements; and demonstrated
commitment to the Native Hawaiian community.
The office of Hawaiian affairs shall select one of the
members appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) to serve as the
chairperson of the working group.
(c) The working group, with the cooperation of any
department or agency that uses, manages, or receives income,
proceeds, or any other funds derived from the public land trust,
shall prepare and submit a report of its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation and the
amount it determines for the annual amount of the twenty per
cent pro rata share of income and proceeds from the public land
trust, to the legislature.
(d) The working group shall oversee and be responsible for
the completion of the following tasks, which shall be carried
out with the support of independent third-party professionals
retained to fulfill the objectives of the working group:
(1) Regarding the public land trust inventory:
(A) Document the current data collection and
reporting processes;
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 20
illiEIIUIIIIIIIIUIIIHIIilllllll

Page 21
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(B) Assess the accuracy, completeness, and
reliability of land parcels in the public land
trust information system;
(C) Determine whether the public land trust
information system complies with and fulfills the
purposes of Act 54, Session Laws of Hawaii 2011;
(D) Identify issues and gaps in reporting on public
land trust inventory and encumbrances across
federal, state, and county agencies;
(E) Assess the accuracy of the reporting of parcel
trust status; and
(F) Recommend improvements to reporting consistency,
land inventory accuracy, encumbrance reporting,
and assignments of tax map key numbers to all
parcels; and
(2) Regarding section 5 of Act 178, Session Laws of Hawaii
2006, financial reporting and accounting;
(A) Document the current processes as to how the data
is being collected and reported;
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 21
iiMiiwnaoiiiiaimiuiiii

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(B) Validate the accuracy, completeness, and
reliability of the reporting of revenue data
derived from the public land trust;
(C) Identify issues and gaps in reporting revenues
across state agencies;
(D) Assess the accuracy of the reporting of parcel
trust status; and
(E) Recommend improvements to financial tracking and
reporting consistency for all parcels.
(e) The working group shall evaluate and recommend a
process by which the State may initiate and conduct negotiations
with the office of Hawaiian affairs regarding a comprehensive
public land trust reconciliation framework, to include;
(1) Determining the nature of the revenues from the public
land trust that constitute the pro rata share of the
office of Hawaiian affairs, considering the definition
of "revenue" previously enacted by section 3 of
Act 304, Session Laws of Hawaii 1990;
(2) Determining a methodology and formula for calculating
the amounts necessary to fulfill the State's
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 22
lllllillllllilliillllilli

Page 23
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
obligations relating to public land trust revenue
claims from July 1, 2012; and
(3) Determining the conditions under which the office of
Hawaiian affairs may negotiate a master settlement
with the State.
(f) In addition to the report required under
subsection (c), the working group shall submit to the
legislature:
(1) No later than August 1, 2027, a first interim report
on the progress toward the preliminary financial
reporting and accounting related to Act 178, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2006, required pursuant to subsection
(d) (2) ;
No later than December 1, 2027, a second interim
report on the progress toward the public land trust
inventory required pursuant to subsection (d)(1);
(3) No later than June 1, 2028, a third interim report
that includes a preliminary draft of findings and
recommendations regarding Act 178, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2006, financial reporting and accounting and
the public land trust inventory; and
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx
iHiiiMiniiiiiiiiiiiin

Page 24 S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
(4) No later than October 1, 2028, a final report that
includes proposed legislation based on the findings
and considerations of the third interim report
submitted pursuant to paragraph (3);
No later than December 31, 2028, the office of Hawaiian
affairs shall submit to the legislature its findings and
considerations pursuant to subsection (e).
[ (d)’] (g) The office of Hawaiian affairs shall provide any
necessary administrative support, including preparation of the
[rcpo-rt-] reports required by [oubocction—{-e-br] this Act, to the
working group[—] in coordination with a third-party consultant.”
SECTION 3. (a) There is appropriated out of the
carry-forward trust holding account established and administered
by the director of finance, pursuant to executive orders 06-06
and 22-04, the sum of $55,000,000 or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027, to be transferred by the
director of finance to the office of Hawaiian affairs as a
one-time transfer.
The transferred funds shall be used by the office of
Hawaiian affairs solely for Native Hawaiian programs and
services with critical, short-term funding needs in the areas of
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 24
HIOmWHIIIilillMnHI

Page 25
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
education, health, economic development, and community-based
initiatives. The transferred funds may not be used for
planning, developing, or constructing residential or mixed-use
projects or related infrastructure.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
budget and finance for the purposes of this section.
(b) The office of Hawaiian affairs shall provide an annual
report to the legislature regarding the use of the funds
appropriated under subsection (a) .
(c) The appropriation under subsection (a) is not intended
to:
(1) Replace or offset the State's obligations under the
public land trust; or
(2) Establish precedent for determining the amount or
nature of the income and proceeds from the public land
trust that shall be transferred to the office of
Hawaiian affairs.
SECTION 4. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to
alter, diminish, or affect any rights, claims, or entitlements
of the office of Hawaiian affairs or the beneficiaries of the
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 25
ninniiiiiniiiiiiiNiiiii

Page 26
S.B. NO.
^2
C.D. 1
public land trust under federal law, the Hawaii State
Constitution, or state law.
SECTION 5. No later than fifteen days after the effective
date of this Act, the president of the senate and speaker of the
house of representatives shall appoint two members each to the
working group established by Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii
2022, as amended by this Act.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that section 3 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2571 SB903 CDl SMA.docx 26
HiliiiMMimniiiiiiiiiiiiii

903
S.B. NO
cd
X
d
Q
ci
ci
(M
CM
T-
APPROVED this 22nd day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 903, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
216-26

SB No. 903, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives